Wisconsin, session 2025, AB647.
do enact as follows:AB647,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB647,28Section 2. 20.255 (2) (bp) of the statutes is created to read:AB647,2,10920.255 (2) (bp) Grants for whole grade sharing agreements. As a continuing 10appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for grants under s. 118.50 (5m).AB647,311Section 3. 118.50 (5m) of the statutes is created to read:AB647,2,1312118.50 (5m) Grants. (a) A school board that enters into a whole grade 13sharing agreement is eligible for a grant under par. (b).AB647,2,1914(b) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, subject to par. (c), the department 15shall award a 4-year grant to an eligible school board. For each school year of the 16grant, the department shall distribute to the grant recipient an amount equal to 17$500 multiplied by the number of pupils who are enrolled in the school district in 18that school year in a grade level that is subject to the whole grade sharing 19agreement.AB647,3,220(c) The department may not award a grant under par. (b) unless the 21department determines that the amount appropriated for grants under this 1subsection is sufficient to pay the full amount of all grants awarded previously 2under par. (b).AB647,3,53(d) 1. Annually, a school board that receives a grant under par. (b) shall 4submit a report to the department that describes the use of the moneys the school 5board received under this subsection in the previous school year.AB647,3,862. Annually, the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on 7finance describing grants awarded under par. (b) and the use of moneys awarded 8under this subsection in the previous school year.AB647,3,99